en: Tool Cabinets & Chests
xx: Tool Cabinets & Chests
cs: Skříňky na nářadí
da: Værktøjsskabe
de: Werkzeugschränke
es: Armarios para herramientas
fr: Armoires à outils
it: Armadietti per attrezzi
ja: 工具キャビネット
nl: Gereedschapskasten
no: Verktøyskap
pl: Szafy narzędziowe
pt: Armários de ferramentas
ru: Шкафы для инструментов
sv: Verktygsskåp
tr: Alet Dolapları

en: Tool Organizer Liners & Inserts
xx: Tool Organizer Liners & Inserts
cs: Vložky do organizérů na nářadí
da: Værktøjskasseopdelere og -indsatser
de: Einsätze zur Werkzeugaufbewahrung
es: Protectores y compartimentos para herramientas
fr: Rangements et caissons pour caisses à outils
it: Fodere e inserti per l'organizzazione di strumenti
ja: 工具箱用中敷/シート
nl: Verdeel- en inzetstukken voor gereedschaporganizers
no: Verktøykasseinnlegg og -innmat
pl: Organizery do narzędzi
pt: Organizador de ferramentas
ru: Подложки и держатели для инструментов
sv: Insatser för verktygslåda
tr: Araç Düzenleyici Yuvaları

en: Tool Sheaths
xx: Tool Sheaths
cs: Pouzdra na nářadí
da: Værktøjsskeder
de: Werkzeugetuis
es: Fundas de herramientas
fr: Étuis pour outils
it: Custodie per attrezzi
ja: 工具カバー・工具ケース
nl: Gereedschaphouders
no: Verktøyslirer
pl: Pochwy na narzędzia
pt: Bainhas porta-ferramentas
ru: Футляры для инструментов
sv: Verktygsfodral
tr: Alet Kılıfları

en: Work Benches
xx: Work Benches
cs: Dílenské stoly
da: Arbejdsbænke
de: Werkbänke
es: Mesas de trabajo
fr: Établis
it: Banchi da lavoro
ja: 作業台
nl: Werkbanken
no: Arbeidsbenker
pl: Stoły robocze
pt: Bancadas de trabalho
ru: Верстаки
sv: Arbetsbänkar
tr: Çalışma Tezgahları

en: Wall Jacks & Braces
xx: Wall Jacks & Braces
cs: Zvedáky a podpěry stěn
da: Skråstivere til bygningsdele
de: Richtstützen
es: Jabalcones y riostras
fr: Étais et renforts de murs
it: Staffe e jack da parete
ja: ウォールジャッキ・支持具
nl: Bouwstempels en -schoren
no: Veggjekker og monteringsstøtter
pl: Podnośniki i podpórki budowlane
pt: Alavancas e braçadeiras de parece
ru: Опоры для стен
sv: Domkraft för lyft av vägg och väggstöd
tr: Duvar Kaldıraçları ve Köşebentleri

en: Hardware Pumps
xx: Hardware Pumps
cs: Čerpadla
da: Pumper
de: Metallpumpen
es: Bombas
fr: Pompes
it: Pompe da ferramenta
ja: ハードウェア ポンプ
nl: Pompen
no: Maskinpumper
pl: Pompy
pt: Bombas de hardware
ru: Насосы
sv: Pumpmaskiner
tr: Teçhizat Pompaları

en: Home Appliance Pumps
xx: Home Appliance Pumps
cs: Čerpadla pro domácí spotřebiče
da: Pumper til husholdningsapparater
de: Haushaltsgerätepumpen
es: Bombas para electrodomésticos
fr: Pompes pour équipements ménagers
it: Pompe per elettrodomestici
ja: 家電用ポンプ
nl: Pompen voor huishoudelijke apparaten
no: Pumper til husholdningsapparater
pl: Pompy do urządzeń domowych
pt: Bombas domésticas
ru: Насосы для бытовой техники
sv: Pumpar för hemmabruk
tr: Ev Aletleri Pompaları

en: Pool\, Fountain & Pond Pumps
xx: Pool\, Fountain & Pond Pumps
cs: Čerpadla pro bazény\, fontány a rybníčky
da: Pool-\, springvands- og havedamspumper
de: Pool-\, Brunnen- und Teichpumpen
es: Bombas para piscinas\, fuentes y estanques
fr: Pompes pour bassins\, fontaines et étangs
it: Pompe per piscine\, fontane e laghetti
ja: プール/噴水/池用ポンプ
nl: Zwembad-\, fontein- en vijverpompen
no: Pumper til basseng\, fontener og dammer
pl: Pompy do basenów\, fontann i oczek wodnych
pt: Bombas de piscina\, fonte e lago
ru: Насосы для бассейнов\, фонтанов и прудов
sv: Pool-\, fontän- och dammpumpar
tr: Havuz\, Şelale ve Süs Havuzu Pompaları

en: Sprinkler\, Booster & Irrigation System Pumps
xx: Sprinkler\, Booster & Irrigation System Pumps
cs: Čerpadla pro zavlažovače a postřikovače a pomocná čerpadla
da: Vandings-\, sprinkler- og forstærkerpumper
de: Bewässerungs-\, Sprinkler- und Boosterpumpen
es: Bombas de riego\, aspersión y carga
fr: Pompes d'irrigation\, de gavage et pour arroseurs, Pompe à eau thermique
it: Pompe per irrigazione e irrigatori a pioggia e pompe ausiliarie
ja: 灌漑/スプリンクラー用ポンプ、ブースター ポンプ
nl: Irrigatie-\, sprinkler- en boosterpompen
no: Vannings-\, sprinkler- og akseleratorpumper
pl: Pompy do nawadniania i spryskiwania
pt: Bombas de irrigação\, regador e reforço
ru: Насосы для дождевателей и оросительной техники
sv: Bevattnings-\, sprinkler- och stegringspumpar
tr: Sulama\, Fıskiye ve Hidrofor Pompaları

en: Sump\, Sewage & Effluent Pumps
xx: Sump\, Sewage & Effluent Pumps
cs: Čerpadla pro jímky a odpady
da: Sump-\, kloak- og spildevandspumper
de: Sickergruben-\, Abwasser- und Abflusspumpen
es: Bombas para lodos\, aguas residuales y efluentes
fr: Pompes d'épuisement\, d'effluent et pour relèvement d'eaux usées
it: Pompe per pozzi neri\, liquami e scarichi
ja: 排水/下水/廃水用ポンプ
nl: Drainage-\, riool- en afvoerpompen
no: Pumper til sump\, kloakk og avløp
pl: Pompy do systemów oczyszczania
pt: Bombas de drenagem\, esgoto e efluentes
ru: Насосы для откачки сточных вод
sv: Behållar-\, kloak- och avloppspumpar
tr: Lağım Çukuru\, Kanalizasyon ve Atık Su Pompaları

en: Utility Pumps
xx: Utility Pumps
cs: Ostatní čerpadla
da: Dykpumper
de: Pumpen zur Entwässerung und Wasserleitung
es: Bombas de agua
fr: Pompes d'appoint
it: Pompe per utenze
ja: ユーティリティ ポンプ
nl: Algemene dienstpompen
no: Redskapspumper
pl: Pompy przenośne
pt: Bombas auxiliares
ru: Перекачивающие насосы
sv: Vattenpumpar
tr: Şehir Şebekesi Pompaları

en: Well Pumps & Systems
xx: Well Pumps & Systems
cs: Domácí vodárny
da: Brøndpumper og -systemer
de: Brunnenpumpen und -systeme
es: Sistemas de bombeo
fr: Pompes et systèmes de puisage
it: Pompe e sistemi per pozzi
ja: 井戸ポンプ、井戸設備
nl: Waterputpompen en -systemen
no: Brønnpumper og -systemer
pl: Pompy i systemy do studni
pt: Bombas e sistema de poços
ru: Колодезные насосы и системы
sv: Brunnspumpar och -system
tr: Kuyu Pompaları ve Sistemleri

en: Heating\, Ventilation & Air Conditioning
xx: Heating\, Ventilation & Air Conditioning
cs: Topení\, větrání a klimatizace
da: Ventilation
de: Heizen\, Belüftung & Klimaanlagen
es: Ventilación y calefacción
fr: Chauffage\, ventilation et climatisation
it: Ventilazione\, riscaldamento e condizionamento
ja: 換気・空調
nl: Ventilatie
no: Ventilasjon
pl: Wentylacja
pt: Aquecimento\, ventilação e ar condicionado
ru: Товары для отопления\, вентиляции и кондиционирования воздуха
sv: Ventilering
tr: Havalandırma

en: Air & Filter Dryers
xx: Air & Filter Dryers
cs: Vysoušeče filtrů
da: Fugtfiltre
de: Filtertrockner
es: Secadores de filtros
fr: Filtres déshydrateurs
it: Filtri/essiccatori
ja: フィルター ドライヤー
nl: Filterdrogers
no: Filtertørkere
pl: Osuszacze filtrujące
pt: Filtro secador
ru: Осушители фильтра
sv: Luftfilter
tr: Filtreli Kurutucular

en: Air Ducts
xx: Air Ducts
cs: Vzduchovody
da: Ventilationskanaler
de: Luftkanäle
es: Conductos de aire
fr: Conduits d'air
it: Condotti d'aria
ja: エアダクト
nl: Luchtkanalen
no: Luftekanaler
pl: Kanały wentylacyjne
pt: Dutos de ar
ru: Воздуховоды
sv: Luftkanaler
tr: Menfezler

en: HVAC Controls
xx: HVAC Controls
cs: Ovladače topení\, větrání a klimatizace
da: Styreenheder
de: Steuerungen
es: Controles de climatización
fr: Commandes de chauffage\, ventilation et climatisation
it: Controlli HVAC
ja: 換気・空調制御システム
nl: Airco-bedieningselementen
no: HVAC-kontroller
pl: Sterowniki HVAC
pt: Controles
ru: Устройства управления системами ОВКВ
sv: Kontroller för värme\, ventilation och luftkonditionering
tr: HVAC Kumandaları

en: Control Panels
xx: Control Panels
cs: Ovládací panely
da: Kontrolpaneler
de: Schalt- & Bedienungstafeln
es: Paneles de control
fr: Tableaux de commandes
it: Quadri di controllo
ja: 換気・空調制御盤
nl: Bedieningspanelen
no: Kontrollpaneler
pl: Panele sterowania
pt: Painéis de controle
ru: Панели управления
sv: Kontrollpaneler
tr: Kumanda Panelleri

en: Humidistats
xx: Humidistats
cs: Hygrostaty
da: Fugtregulatorer
de: Feuchtigkeitsregler
es: Hidrostatos
fr: Humidostats
it: Strumenti per la misurazione dell'umidità
ja: 恒湿器
nl: Hygrostaten
no: Hygrostater
pl: Hydrostaty
pt: Umidostatos
ru: Регуляторы влажности воздуха
sv: Luftfuktighetsmätare
tr: Nem Ayarlayıcılar

en: Thermostats
xx: Thermostats
cs: Termostaty
da: Termostater
de: Thermostate
es: Termostatos
fr: Thermostats
it: Termostati
ja: サーモスタット
nl: Thermostaten
no: Termostater
pl: Termostaty
pt: Termostatos
ru: Термостаты
sv: Termostater
tr: Termostatlar

en: Vents & Flues
xx: Vents & Flues
cs: Ventilace a kouřovody
da: Udluftningsventiler og aftræk
de: Luftdurchlässe & Abzugsrohre
es: Tubos de ventilación y de humos
fr: Bouches et conduits de ventilation
it: Bocche e condotti aerazione
ja: 換気口・煙道
nl: Ventilatieopeningen en rookkanalen
no: Luftekanaler og avtrekk
pl: Wentylatory i przewody wentylacyjne
pt: Respiros e chaminés
ru: Вентиляция и воздуховоды
sv: Ventiler och varmluftsrör
tr: Menfezler ve Borular